test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ceaeppat_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čeäppat e-stem kaula: # Noun "neck/kaula" - full paradigm
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Nom: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Gen: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Acc: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Ill: čeäppta
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Loc: čeäpptest
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Com: čeäpptin
     čeäppat+N+Ess: čeäppten
     čeäppat+N+Par: čeäppted
     čeäppat+N+Sg+Abe: [čeäppatʼtaa, čeäppatʼtää]
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Nom: čeäppat
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Gen: čeäppti
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Acc: čeäpptid
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Ill: čeäpptid
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Loc: čeäpptin
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Com: čeäpptivuiʹm
     čeäppat+N+Pl+Abe: [čeäpptitaa, čeäpptitää]
